Hawaii statutes.
[Part XI.] law enforcement officer
independent review board

Note

Part effective July 1, 2017, and repealed June 30, 2022. L
2016, c 161, §7(3).

Law enforcement officer independent review board; report on
activities to 2022 legislature. L 2016, c 161, §3.

[§28-151] Definitions. As used
in this part:

"Board" means the law enforcement
officer independent review board established by section 28-152.

"Law enforcement agency" means any
county police department, the department of public safety, and any state or
county public body that employs law enforcement officers.

"Law enforcement officer" means a
sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, enforcement officer within the
department of land and natural resources conservation and resources enforcement
program, enforcement officer within the department of transportation harbors
division, and any other employee of a state or county public body who carries a
badge and firearm and has powers of arrest.

"Officer-involved death" means a
death of an individual that results directly from an act or omission of a law
enforcement officer while the law enforcement officer is on duty or while the
law enforcement officer is off duty but performing activities that are within
the scope of the officer's law enforcement duties. [L 2016, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next